District of Columbia statutes.
35-304

Commencement of action.

No action shall be maintained under this chapter unless commenced within 1 year from the time the cause of action accrued.

History

June 11, 1906, 34 Stat. 232, ch. 3073, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 44-404.
1973 Ed., § 44-404.